Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2D-113] Additional duties of the
commissioner. (a) At least once per year, or more frequently if deemed
necessary, the commissioner shall make available in an appropriate manner to
insurers and other entities subject to the scope of this chapter, information
on new laws and rules, enforcement actions, and other information the
commissioner deems pertinent to ensure compliance with market conduct
requirements.

(b) The commissioner shall designate a
specific person or persons within the insurance division whose responsibilities
shall include the receipt of information from employees of insurers and
licensed entities concerning violations of laws, as defined in this section.
The person or persons shall be provided with proper training on the handling of
the information, which shall be deemed a confidential communication for the
purposes of this section.

(c) For any change made to a work product
referenced in this article, which materially changes the way in which market
analysis, market conduct actions, or market conduct examinations are conducted,
the commissioner shall give notice and provide parties with an opportunity for
a public hearing pursuant to chapter 91. [L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next